Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 356.461, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Joint and survivor annuity computation. new text begin (a) new text end Notwithstanding any provision of section 356.215, subdivision 8, or 356.415 to the contrary, for purposes of computing joint and survivor annuitiesnew text begin under each covered retirement plan in subdivision 2new text end , the applicable investment return assumption is 6.5 percentnew text begin unless a different percentage has been approved or deemed approved under paragraph (b) for the covered retirement plannew text end . new text begin (b) A change in the investment return assumption for computing joint and survivor annuities may be proposed by the governing board of a covered retirement plan. The assumption may be changed only with the approval of the Legislative Commission on Pensions and Retirement or after a period of one year has elapsed since the date on which the proposed assumption change was received by the Legislative Commission on Pensions and Retirement without commission action. new text end new text begin (c) The executive director of the Legislative Commission on Pensions and Retirement must update the appendix to the standards for actuarial work whenever a change in the assumption is approved or deemed approved. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end